Utah statutes.
4-9-13.   Weighing and measuring devices -- Presumption.
If a weighing or measuring device is in a place where buying or selling is
commonly carried on, there is a rebuttable presumption that the weighing or
measuring device is regularly used for the business purposes of that place.
